Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB228.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2601-B(2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2601-B. Definitions.--When used in this article the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:* * *(2) "State Board of Education" shall mean the entity known as the State Board of Education and placed within, and made a departmental administrative board of, the [Department of Education] department by section 202 of the act of April 9, 1929 1234567891011121314151617181920 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929."(3) "Department" shall mean the Department of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 2. Sections 2602-B(f), 2603-B(b) and 2606-B of the act are amended to read:Section 2602-B. Membership.--* * *(f) Except for the chairman, not more than two (2) members serving on each council shall be employed either in a school system or in the [Department of Education] department. For purposes of this subsection, the State System of Higher Education shall not be considered a school system. Three (3) members of the Council of Higher Education shall be actively employed by an institution of higher education, at least one holding an administrative position and at least one holding a professional position on a faculty of an institution of higher education. At least two (2) members serving on each council shall have had previous experience with career and technical education or training.* * *Section 2603-B. Powers and Duties of the Board.--* * *(b) The board and the Secretary of Education shall jointly employ and fix the compensation of such staff as it deems necessary to perform the duties of the board. The board shall be entitled to legal counsel which shall be designated by the Office of General Counsel, which legal counsel shall not also be legal counsel to the [Department of Education] department.* * *Section 2606-B. Cooperation Between the Board and the Department [of Education].--Statements of policy, standards, rules and regulations promulgated by the board shall be binding 20250HB0228PN0181 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upon the [Department of Education] department. The department shall submit to the board for approval, modification or rejection, all rules and regulations proposed by the department in the areas under the control of the board. The [Department of Education] department shall furnish upon request of the board such data and information as the board may, from time to time, require, and the department shall provide administrative services for and on behalf of the board for the implementation of the board's statements of policy, standards, rules and regulations.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2607-B. Academic Standards Review.--(a) The board shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this section, establish a schedule for the review of all academic standards under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment). The schedule shall ensure that State academic standards for each content area are reviewed by the board at least every three (3) years.(b) The review by the board shall determine if the State academic standards for each content area are age appropriate, clear, industry specific, academically challenging and meet the needs of the job market. The board shall make revisions to the State academic standards by regulation as necessary.(c) The board shall submit a report of a review made under this section to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include the following contents:(1) A list of all updates and revisions to the State 20250HB0228PN0181 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 academic standards for each specific content area.(2) The purpose for all updates and revisions to State academic standards or if, upon review, the board determines the academic standards for a content area do not require updates or revisions, an explanation for the continuation of current academic standards.(3) A list of stakeholders involved in the review process.(4) The title and citation of any applicable frameworks and guidelines from outside organizations utilized in the development of the updated State academic standards.(5) The time frame for the implementation of the updated State academic standards.(d) The General Assembly may direct the board to conduct a review of the State academic standards under this section by adoption of a concurrent resolution.(e) This section shall not be construed to change any requirement under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act."Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0228PN0181 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819